California statutes. Insurance Code
  CHAPTER 11. Cancellation and Failure to Renew Certain Property Insurance [675. - 679.7.]

675.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 676.8 and 679.6, this chapter shall apply to policies of insurance, other than automobile insurance and workers’ compensation insurance, on risks located or resident in this state which are issued and take effect or which are renewed after the effective date of this chapter and insuring any of the following contingencies:

(1) Loss of or damage to real property which is used predominantly for residential purposes and which consists of not more than four dwelling units.

(2) Loss of or damage to personal property in which natural persons resident in specifically described real property of the kind described in paragraph (1) have an insurable interest, except personal property used in the conduct of a commercial or industrial enterprise.

(3) Legal liability of a natural person or persons for loss of, damage to, or injury to, persons or property, but not including policies primarily insuring risks arising from the conduct of a commercial or industrial enterprise.

(b) This chapter shall not be construed so as to modify or negate any of the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 330) of Part 1 of Division 1, nor to destroy any rights or remedies therein provided.

(c) On and after January 1, 2000, an insurer may not refuse to renew a policy of insurance specified in subdivision (a) solely on the grounds that a claim is pending under the policy. This subdivision is not applicable to claims made under coverage for loss or damage caused by the peril of earthquake as provided in Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 10081) or Chapter 8.6 (commencing with Section 10089.5), of Part 1 of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 313, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

675.1.

(a) In the case of a total loss to the primary insured structure under a policy of residential property insurance subject to Section 675, the following provisions apply:

(1) If reconstruction of the primary insured structure has not been completed by the time of policy renewal, the insurer, prior to or at the time of renewal, and after consultation by the insurer or its representative with the insured as to what limits and coverages might or might not be needed, shall adjust the limits and coverages, write an additional policy, or attach an endorsement to the policy that reflects the change, if any, in the insured’s exposure to loss. The insurer shall adjust the premium charged to reflect any change in coverage.

(2) The insurer shall not cancel coverage while the primary insured structure is being rebuilt, except for the
 reasons specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 676. The insurer shall not use the fact that the primary insured structure is in damaged condition as a result of the total loss as the sole basis for a decision to cancel the policy pursuant to subdivision (e) of that section.

(3) Except for the reasons specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, of Section 676, the insurer shall
 offer, for at least the next two annual renewal periods, but no less than 24 months of coverage from the date of the loss, to renew the policy in accordance with paragraph (1) if the total loss to the primary insured structure was caused by a disaster, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1689.14 of the Civil Code, the loss was not also due to the negligence of the
 insured, and losses have not occurred subsequent to the disaster-related total loss that relate to physical or risk changes to the insured property that result in the property becoming uninsurable.

(4) With respect to policies of residential earthquake insurance, the California Earthquake Authority, or any insurer, including a participating insurer, as defined in subdivision (i) of Section 10089.5, may defer its initial implementation of this section until no later than October 1, 2005.

(5) With respect to a residential earthquake insurance policy issued by the California Earthquake Authority, the following provisions apply:

(A) The participating insurer that issued the underlying policy of residential property insurance on the primary insured structure shall consult with the insured as to what limits and coverages might or might not be needed as required by
 paragraph (1).

(B) The California Earthquake Authority, in lieu of meeting the requirements of paragraph (1), shall establish procedures and practices that allow it to reasonably accommodate the needs and interests of consumers in maintaining appropriate earthquake insurance coverage, within the statutory and regulatory limitations on the types of insurance coverages and the coverage limits of the policies that the
 authority may issue.

(b) (1) An insurer shall not cancel or refuse to renew a policy of residential property insurance for a property located in any ZIP Code within or adjacent to the fire perimeter, for one year after the declaration of a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, based solely on the fact that the insured structure is located in an area in which a wildfire has occurred. This prohibition applies to all policies of residential property insurance in effect at the time of the declared emergency.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the fire perimeter shall be determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection in consultation with the Office of Emergency Services. The department shall provide the commissioner with data
 describing the fire perimeter sufficient for the commissioner to determine which ZIP Codes are within or adjacent to the fire perimeter. The commissioner shall then issue a bulletin to inform insurers which ZIP Codes are subject to this subdivision.

(c) Subdivision (b) does not apply in any of the following circumstances:

(1) If willful or grossly negligent acts or omissions by the named insured, or his or her representatives, are discovered that materially increase any of the risks insured against.

(2) If losses unrelated to the postdisaster loss condition of the property have occurred that would collectively render the risk ineligible for renewal.

(3) If there are physical or risk changes to the insured property beyond the catastrophe-damaged
 condition of the structures and surface landscape that result in the property becoming uninsurable.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “policy of residential property insurance” has the meaning described in subdivision (a) of Section 10087.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 618, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 894)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

675.5.

(a) In addition to any policy of insurance specified in Section 675, this chapter shall apply to policies of commercial insurance issued or issued for delivery in this state which are issued and take effect or are renewed on or after January 1, 1987.

(b) As used in this section, commercial insurance means commercial multiperil, commercial property, commercial liability, commercial special multiperil, commercial comprehensive multiperil, errors and omissions liability, and professional liability insurance, and any other insurance not included in subdivision (d) which covers any of the following contingencies:

(1) Loss of
 or damage to real property used or owned by a commercial or industrial enterprise.

(2) Loss of or damage to personal property, except personally owned motor vehicles, used in the conduct of a commercial or industrial enterprise.

(3) Legal liability of any person for loss of, damage to, or injury to persons or property, arising from the conduct of a commercial or industrial enterprise.

(c) As used in this section, the term commercial or industrial enterprise includes a business operated for profit, a professional practice, a nonprofit organization, or a governmental entity.

(d) As used in this section, the term commercial insurance does not include any of the following:

(1) Workers’
 compensation insurance.

(2) Insurance provided pursuant to the California FAIR plan or the California automobile assigned risk plan.

(3) Disability insurance.

(4) Automobile insurance covered by Section 660 and property insurance covered by Section 675.

(5) Ocean marine insurance.

(6) Fidelity and surety insurance.

(7) Surplus line insurance, which is nonadmitted insurance as defined in subdivision (m) of Section 1760.1.

(8) Reinsurance.

(9) Any insurance, other than professional liability
 insurance for malpractice, errors, or omissions, for which premiums are determined on a retrospective rating basis.

(10) Nuclear liability insurance.

(11) Nuclear property insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 83, Sec. 4.   (AB 315)   Effective July 15, 2011.   Operative July 21, 2011, by Sec. 34 of Stats. 2011, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

675.55.

(a) (1) An insurer shall not cancel or refuse to renew a policy of commercial property insurance for a property located in any ZIP Code within or adjacent to the fire perimeter, for one year after the declaration of a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, based solely on the fact that the insured structure is located in an area in which a wildfire has occurred. This prohibition applies to all policies of commercial property insurance in effect at the time of the declared emergency.

(2) For the purposes of this section, the fire perimeter shall be determined by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection in consultation
 with the Office of Emergency Services. The department shall provide the commissioner with data describing the fire perimeter sufficient for the commissioner to determine which ZIP Codes are within or adjacent to the fire perimeter. The commissioner shall then issue a bulletin to inform insurers which ZIP Codes are subject to this subdivision.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply in any of the following circumstances:

(1) If willful or grossly negligent acts or omissions by the named insured, or the named insured’s representatives, are discovered that materially increase any of the risks insured against.

(2) If losses unrelated to the postdisaster loss condition of the property have occurred that would collectively render the
 risk ineligible for renewal.

(3) If there are physical or risk changes to the insured property
 beyond the catastrophe-damaged condition of the structures and surface landscape that result in the property becoming uninsurable.

(c) (1) For the purposes of this section, “policy of commercial property insurance” is a policy subject to Section 675.5.

(2) For purposes of this section, a “policy of commercial property insurance” does not include either of the following:

(A) Policies that are inland marine, transit, or transportation
 insurance, including commercial automobile insurance.

(B) A policy of commercial property insurance with an annual premium of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or more and the insured employed at least 25 employees on average during the prior 12 months.

(d) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), this section shall apply to a policy of commercial property insurance that insures against loss of, or damage to, real property, used primarily for commercial residential or habitational purposes, including, but not limited to, policies insuring all of the following:

(1) Homeowners associations.

(2) Condominium associations.

(3) Long-term rental hotels or motels.

(4) Apartment complexes.

(5) Condominium complexes.

(6) Multifamily dwellings with greater than five units.

(7) Student housing.

(8) Senior living facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 544, Sec. 1.   (SB 547)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

676.

After a policy specified in Section 675 has been in effect for 60 days, or, if the policy is a renewal, effective immediately, no notice of cancellation shall be effective unless it is based on the occurrence, after the effective date of the policy, of one or more of the following:

(a) Nonpayment of premium, including nonpayment of any additional premiums, calculated in accordance with the current rating manual of the insurer, justified by a physical change in the insured property or a change in its occupancy or use.

(b) Conviction of the named insured of a crime having as one of its necessary elements an act increasing any hazard insured against.

(c) Discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation by either of the following:

(1) The insured or his or her representative in obtaining the insurance.

(2) The named insured or his or her representative in pursuing a claim under the policy.

(d) Discovery of grossly negligent acts or omissions by the insured or his or her representative substantially increasing any of the hazards insured against. 

(e) Physical changes in the insured property which result in the property becoming uninsurable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1321, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

676.1.

(a) The arbitrary cancellation of a policy of homeowners’ insurance solely on the basis that the policyholder has a license to operate a family day care home at the insured location shall subject the insurer to administrative sanctions authorized by this code unless, there has been a material misrepresentation of fact, the risk has changed substantially since the policy was issued, there has been a nonpayment of premium, or the insurer no longer writes homeowners policies. 

(b) The arbitrary refusal to renew a policy of homeowners’ insurance solely on the basis that the policyholder has a license to operate a family day care home at the insured location shall subject the insurer to administrative sanctions authorized by this code unless, there has been a material misrepresentation of fact, the risk has changed substantially since the policy was issued, there has been a nonpayment of premium, or the insurer no longer writes homeowners’ policies. For purposes of this subdivision, an insured’s purchase of a policy of homeowner’s insurance to cover a new, primary residence from the same insurer which insured his or her previous primary residence, provided that the insurer then underwrites homeowners’ insurance in the geographic area containing the new residence, shall be deemed a renewal of the policy on the previous, primary residence. 

(c) It shall be against public policy for a residential property insurance policy to provide coverage for liability for losses arising out of, or in connection with, the operation of a family day care home. This coverage shall only be provided by a separate endorsement or insurance policy for which premiums have been assessed and collected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 784, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

676.2.

(a) This section applies only to policies of commercial insurance that are subject to Section 675.5.

(b) After a policy has been in effect for more than 60 days, or if the policy is a renewal, effective immediately, no notice of cancellation shall be effective unless it complies with Section 677.2 and it is based on the occurrence, after the effective date of the policy, of one or more of the following:

(1) Nonpayment of premium, including payment due on a prior policy issued by the insurer and due during the current policy term covering the same risks.

(2) A judgment by a court or an administrative tribunal that the named insured has violated any law of this state or of the United States having as one of its necessary elements an act that materially increases any of the risks insured against.

(3) Discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation by either of the following:

(A) The insured or the insured’s representative in obtaining the insurance.

(B) The named insured or the named insured’s
 representative in pursuing a claim under the policy.

(4) Discovery of willful or grossly negligent acts or omissions, or of any violations of state laws or regulations establishing safety standards, by the named insured or the named insured’s representative, which materially increase any of the risks insured against.

(5) Failure by the named insured or the named insured’s representative to implement reasonable loss control requirements that were agreed to by the insured as a condition of policy issuance or that were conditions precedent to the use by the insurer of a particular rate or rating plan, if the failure materially increases any of the risks insured against.

(6) A determination by the
 commissioner that the loss of, or changes in, an insurer’s reinsurance covering all or part of the risk would threaten the financial integrity or solvency of the insurer. A certification made under penalty of perjury to the commissioner by an officer of the insurer of the loss of, or change in, reinsurance and that the loss or change will threaten the financial integrity or solvency of the insurer if the cancellation of the policy is not permitted shall constitute this determination unless disapproved by the commissioner within 30 days of the filing. There shall be no extensions to this 30-day period.

(7) A determination by the commissioner that a continuation of the policy coverage would place the insurer in violation of the laws of this state or the state of its domicile or that the continuation of coverage would threaten the solvency of
 the insurer.

(8) A change by the named insured or the named insured’s representative in the activities or property of the commercial or industrial enterprise that results in a material added risk, a materially increased risk, or a materially changed risk, unless the added, increased, or changed risk is included in the policy.

(c) (1) After a policy has been in effect for more than 60 days, or if the policy is a renewal, effective immediately upon renewal, no increase in the rate upon which the premium is based, reduction in limits, or change in the conditions of coverage shall be effective during the policy period unless a written notice is mailed or delivered to the named insured and the producer of record at the mailing address shown on the policy, at least 30 days
 prior to the effective date of the increase, reduction, or change.
 The time periods and procedures in subdivision (a) of Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable if the notice is mailed. The notice shall state the effective date of, and the reasons for, the increase, reduction, or change.

(2) The increase, reduction, or change shall not be effective unless it is based upon one of the following reasons:

(A) Discovery of willful or grossly negligent acts or omissions, or of any violations of state laws or regulations establishing safety standards by the named insured that materially increase any of the risks or hazards insured against.

(B) Failure by the named insured to implement reasonable loss control requirements that were agreed to by the insured as a condition
 of policy issuance or that were conditions precedent to the use by the insurer of a particular rate or rating plan, if the failure materially increases any of the risks insured against.

(C) A determination by the commissioner that loss of or changes in an insurer’s reinsurance covering all or part of the risk covered by the policy would threaten the financial integrity or solvency of the insurer unless the change in the terms or conditions or rate upon which the premium is based is permitted.

(D) A change by the named insured in the activities or property of the commercial or industrial enterprise that results in a materially added risk, a materially increased risk, or a materially changed
 risk, unless the added, increased, or changed risk is included in the policy.

(E) With respect to a change in the rate of a policy of professional liability insurance for a health care provider, the insurer’s offer of renewal notifies the policyholder that the insurer has an application filed pursuant to Section 1861.05 pending with the commissioner for approval of a change in the rate upon which the premium is based, and the commissioner subsequently approves the rate change, or some different amount for the policy period. The change shall not be retroactive.

(d) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Title 2 of Division 3 of the
 Government Code) shall not apply to a determination pursuant to paragraph (6) or (7) of subdivision (b) or subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). The commissioner shall charge an insurer who requests a determination pursuant to paragraph (6) or (7) of subdivision (b) a fee sufficient to recover the costs of making the determination. If the commissioner does not act upon a request by an insurer to cancel or change a policy pursuant to those provisions within 30 days, the request shall be deemed to be approved.

(e) This section shall not prohibit an insurer from increasing a premium during the policy period if the increase is calculated in accordance with the current rating manual of the insurer and is justified by a physical change in the insured property or by a change in the activities of the commercial or industrial
 enterprise that materially increases any of the risks insured against.

(f) This section shall not apply to a transfer of a policy without a change in its terms or conditions or the rate upon which the premium is based between insurers that are members of the same insurance group.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 4.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

676.3.

Nothing in Section 676.2 shall preclude the imposition of remedial underwriting action upon coverage insuring dentists or physicians and surgeons against legal liability arising from the rendering of professional services by an insured licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, respectively, if remedial underwriting action is imposed pursuant to the recommendation of an underwriting committee advising the insurer; provided that a majority of the members of that committee are licensed pursuant to the chapter of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code that is applicable to that particular insured, and written notification of the proposed remedial underwriting action is first given to the insured, and the insured is afforded not less than 30 days to present opposition or argument to the underwriting committee as to why the remedial underwriting action should be modified or withheld, prior to any imposition thereof. Remedial underwriting action includes all actions described in subdivision (c) of Section 676.2. Remedial underwriting action imposed pursuant to this section shall not be subject to Article 7 (commencing with Section 1858) of Chapter 9 of Part 2, but nothing in this section shall deny the right of the commissioner to investigate, pursue enforcement action, and seek other remedies as authorized by Article 1 (commencing with Section 12919) of Chapter 2 of Division 3.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage peer review by insurers providing coverage to persons engaged in the provision of health services and the adoption of conditions of coverage which are intended to protect the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 600, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

676.4.

Nothing in Section 676.2 shall preclude, while the policies are in force, changes in the rate upon which the premium is based or the conditions of coverage, or both, of policies insuring health care facilities licensed pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, if the change is imposed pursuant to the recommendation of a health care facility professional liability advisory committee advising the insurer; provided that a majority of the members of the committee are duly authorized representatives of health care facilities licensed pursuant to that Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and written notification of the change is given to all affected insureds at least 30 days prior to any such change.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1618, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

676.5.

(a) This section applies only to policies of commercial insurance which are subject to Section 675.5.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), for purposes of this chapter only, a policy with no fixed expiration, or with a term of less than one year, shall be considered to be a policy for a term of one year, and a policy written for a term of more than one year shall be considered as if written for successive terms of one year.

(c) For purposes of this chapter, a policy shall be considered to be for a term of less than one year if the policy is issued for a specific risk which does not continue beyond the period of the policy, or if the insured requests a policy for a term of less than one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1321, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

676.6.

(a) This section applies to commercial umbrella liability insurance policies, commercial excess liability insurance policies, and commercial excess property insurance policies.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Umbrella liability insurance policy” means an insurance policy providing liability coverage per person or per occurrence or per claim, when written over one or more underlying liability policies or over a specified amount of self-insured retention.

(2) “Excess liability insurance policy” means an insurance policy providing liability covrage per person or per occurrence or per claim when written over one or more underlying liability policies. Excess liability policies shall include policies written over umbrella liability policies.

(3) “Excess property insurance policy” means a policy providing property coverage per occurrence or per location when written over one or more underlying property insurance policies or a specified amount of self-insured retention.

(c) After a policy defined in subdivision (b) of this section has been in effect for more than 60 days, or if the policy is a renewal, effective immediately, no notice of cancellation shall be effective unless it complies with Section 677. 2, is based on one or more of the grounds set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 676.2, or is based on one or more of the following:

(1) A material change in limits, type or scope of coverage, or exclusions in one or more of the underlying policies.

(2) Cancellation or nonrenewal of one or more of the underlying policies where such policies are not replaced without lapse.

(3) A reduction in financial rating or grade of one or more insurers, insuring one or more underlying policies based on an evaluation obtained from a recognized financial rating organization.

(d) A notice of nonrenewal shall not be required in any of the following situations:

(1) The transfer of, or renewal of, a policy without a change in its terms or conditions or the rate on which the premium is based between insurers which are members of the same insurance group.

(2) The policy has been extended for 90 days or less, if the notice required in subdivision (c) has been given prior to the extension.

(3) The named insured has obtained replacement coverage or has agreed, in writing, within 60 days of the termination of the policy, to obtain that coverage. 

(4) The policy is for a period of no more than 60 days and the insured is notified at the time of issuance that it may not be renewed.

(5) The named insured requests a change in the terms or conditions or risks covered by the policy within 60 days prior to the end of the policy period.

(6) The insurer has made a written offer to the insured, within the time period specified in subdivision (c), to renew the policy under changed terms or conditions or at a changed premium rate. As used herein, “terms or conditions” includes, but is not limited to, a reduction in limits, elimination of coverages, or an increase in deductibles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1618, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

676.7.

(a) No admitted insurer, licensed to issue and issuing homeowner’s or tenant’s policies, as described in Section 122, shall (1) fail or refuse to accept an application for that insurance or to issue that insurance to an applicant or (2) cancel that insurance, solely on the basis that the applicant or policyholder is engaged in foster home activities in a licensed foster family home or licensed small family home, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, or an approved resource family, as defined in Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Coverage under policies described in subdivision (a) with respect to a foster child shall be the same as that
 provided for a natural child. However, unless specifically provided in the policy, there shall be no coverage expressly provided in the policy for any bodily injury arising out of the operation or use of any motor vehicle, aircraft, or watercraft owned or operated by, or rented or loaned to, any foster parent.

(c) It is against public policy for a policy of homeowner’s or tenant’s insurance subject to this section to provide liability coverage for any of the following losses:

(1) Claims of a foster child, or a parent, guardian, or guardian ad litem thereof, of a type payable by the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund established by Section 1527.1 of the Health and Safety Code, regardless of whether the claim is within the limits of coverage specified in Section 1527.4 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) An insurer shall not be liable, under a policy of insurance subject to this section, to any governmental agency for damage arising from occurrences peculiar to the foster-care relationship and the provision of foster-care services.

(3) Alienation of affection of a foster child.

(4) Any loss arising out of licentious, immoral, or sexual behavior on the part of a foster parent intended to lead to, or culminating in, any sexual act.

(5) Any loss arising out of a dishonest, fraudulent, criminal, or intentional act.

(d) There shall be no penalty for violations of this section prior to January 1, 1987.

(e) Insurers may provide a special endorsement to a homeowners’ or tenants’
 policy covering claims related to foster care that are not excluded by subdivision (c).

(f) Insurers may provide by a separate policy for some or all of the claims related to foster care that are excluded by subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 56.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

676.75.

(a) No admitted insurer, licensed to issue and issuing homeowner’s or tenant’s policies, as described in Section 122, shall (1) fail or refuse to accept an application for that insurance or to issue that insurance to an applicant or (2) cancel that insurance, solely on the basis that the applicant or policyholder is engaged in foster home activities in a certified family home, as defined in Section 1506 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) Coverage under policies described in subdivision (a) with respect to a foster child shall be the same as that provided for a natural child. However, unless specifically provided in the policy, there shall be no coverage expressly provided in the policy for any bodily injury arising out of the operation or use of any motor vehicle,
 aircraft, or watercraft owned or operated by, or rented or loaned to, any foster parent.

(c) It is against public policy for a policy of homeowner’s or tenant’s insurance subject to this section to provide liability coverage for any of the following losses:

(1) An insurer shall not be liable, under a policy of insurance subject to this section, to any governmental agency for damage arising from occurrences peculiar to the foster care relationship and the provision of foster care services.

(2) Alienation of affection of a foster child.

(3) Any loss arising out of licentious, immoral, or sexual behavior on the part of a foster parent intended to lead to, or culminating in, any sexual act.

(4) Any loss arising out of a dishonest, fraudulent, criminal, or intentional act.

(d) There shall be no penalty for violations of this section prior to January 1, 2013.

(e) Insurers may provide a special endorsement to a homeowner’s or tenant’s policy covering claims related to foster care that are not excluded by subdivision (c).

(f) Insurers may provide by a separate policy for some or all of the claims related to foster care that are excluded by subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 133.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

676.8.

(a) This section applies only to policies of workers’ compensation insurance.

(b) After a policy is in effect, a notice of cancellation shall not be effective unless it complies with the notice requirements of this section and is based upon the occurrence, after the effective date of the policy, of one or more of the following:

(1) The policyholder’s failure to make any workers’ compensation insurance premium payment when due.

(2) The policyholder’s failure to report payroll, to permit the insurer to audit payroll as required by the terms of the policy or of a
 previous policy issued by the insurer, or to pay any additional premium as a result of an audit of payroll as required by the terms of the policy or of a previous policy.

(3) The policyholder’s material failure to comply with federal or state safety orders or written recommendations of the insurer’s designated loss control representative.

(4) A material change in ownership or any change in the policyholder’s business or operations that materially increases the hazard for frequency or severity of loss, requires additional or different classifications for premium calculations, or contemplates an activity excluded by the insurer’s reinsurance treaties.

(5) Material misrepresentation by the policyholder or its agent.

(6) Failure to cooperate with the insurer in the insurer’s investigation of a claim.

(c) A policy shall not be canceled for the conditions specified in paragraph (1), (2), (5), or (6) of subdivision (b) except upon 10 days’ written notice to the policyholder by the insurer. A policy shall not be canceled for the conditions specified in paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (b) except upon 30 days’ written notice to the policyholder by the insurer, provided that notice is not required if an insured and insurer consent to the cancellation and reissuance of a policy effective upon a material change in ownership or operations of the insured. The time periods and procedures in subdivision (a) of Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be applicable if the notice is mailed. If
 the policyholder remedies the condition to the insurer’s satisfaction within the specified time period, the policy shall not be canceled by the insurer.

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude, while policies are in force, changes in the premium rate required or authorized by law, regulation, or order of the commissioner, or otherwise agreed to between the policyholder and insurer.

(e) Any policy written for a term longer than one year, or any policy with no fixed expiration date, shall be considered as if written for successive policy periods of one year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 5.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

676.9.

(a) This section applies to policies covered by Sections 675 and 675.5.

(b) No insurer issuing policies subject to this section shall deny or refuse to accept an application, refuse to insure, refuse to renew, cancel, restrict, or otherwise terminate, or charge a different rate for the same coverage, on the basis that the applicant or insured person is, has been, or may be, a victim of domestic violence.

(c) Nothing in this section shall prevent an insurer subject to this section from taking any of the actions set forth in subdivision (b) on the basis of criteria not otherwise made invalid by this section or any other act, regulation, or rule of law. If discrimination by an insurer is not in violation of this section but is based on any other criteria that are allowable by law, the fact that the applicant or insured is, has been, or may be the subject of domestic violence shall be irrelevant.

(d) For purposes of this section, information that indicates that a person is, has been, or may be a victim of domestic violence is personal information within the meaning of Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2.

(e) No insurer that issues policies subject to this section, and no person employed by or under contract with an insurer that issues policies subject to this section, shall request any information the insurer or person knows or reasonably should know relates to acts of domestic violence or an applicant’s or insured’s status as a victim of domestic violence, or make use of this information however obtained, except for the limited purpose of complying with legal obligations, verifying a person’s claim to be a subject of domestic violence, or cooperating with a victim of domestic violence in seeking protection from domestic violence or facilitating the treatment of a domestic violence-related medical condition. This subdivision does not prohibit an insurer from asking an applicant or insured about a property and casualty claim, even if the claim is related to domestic violence, or from using information thereby obtained in evaluating and carrying out its rights and duties under the policy, to the extent otherwise permitted by this section and other applicable law.

(f) As used in this section, “domestic violence” means domestic violence as defined in Section 6211 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 845, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

676.10.

(a) This section applies to policies covered by Section 675, 675.5, or 676.5 if the insured is a religious organization described in clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 170 of Title 26 of the United States Code, an educational organization described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 170 of Title 26 of the United States Code, or other nonprofit organization described in clause (vi) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Section 170 of Title 26 of the United States Code that is organized and operated for religious, charitable, or educational purposes, or a reproductive health services facility, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 423.1 of
 the Penal Code, or its administrative offices.

(b) No insurer issuing policies subject to this section shall cancel or refuse to renew the policy, nor shall any premium be excessive or unfairly discriminatory solely on the basis that one or more claims has been made against the policy during the preceding 60 months for a loss that is the result of a hate crime committed against the person or property of the insured, or an antireproductive rights crime.

(c) As it relates to this section, if determined by a law enforcement agency, a “hate crime” may include any of the following:
